Washington statutes.
RCW 41.76.040

Procedures for grievance arbitration—Subpoenas—Commission—Superior courts.

A collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter may include procedures for final and binding grievance arbitration of the disputes arising about the interpretation or application of the agreement.

(1) The parties to a collective bargaining agreement may agree on one or more permanent umpires to serve as arbitrator, or may agree on any impartial person to serve as arbitrator, or may agree to select arbitrators from any source available to them, including federal and private agencies, in addition to the staff and dispute resolution panel maintained by the commission.

(2) An arbitrator may require any person to attend as a witness, and to bring with him or her any book, record, document, or other evidence. Subpoenas shall issue and be signed by the arbitrator and shall be served in the same manner as subpoenas to testify before a court of record in this state. The fees for such attendance shall be paid by the party requesting issuance of the subpoena and shall be the same as the fees of witnesses in the superior court. If any person so summoned to testify refuses or neglects to obey such subpoena, upon petition authorized by the arbitrator, the superior court may compel the attendance of such person before the arbitrator, or punish the person for contempt in the same manner provided for the attendance of witnesses or the punishment of them in the courts of this state.

(3) The arbitrator shall appoint a time and place for the hearing and notify the parties thereof, and may adjourn the hearing from time to time as may be necessary, and, on application of either party and for good cause, may postpone the hearing to a time not extending beyond a date fixed by the collective bargaining agreement for making the award. The arbitrator has the power to administer oaths. The arbitration award shall be in writing and signed by the arbitrator or a majority of the members of the arbitration panel. The arbitrator shall, promptly upon its rendition, serve a true copy of the award on each of the parties or their attorneys.

(4) If a party to a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter refuses to submit a grievance for arbitration, the other party to the collective bargaining agreement may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court for any county in which the labor dispute exists, and such court has jurisdiction to issue an order compelling arbitration. The commission, on its own motion, may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court where a strike or lockout is in existence. Arbitration shall be ordered if the grievance states a claim which on its face is covered by the collective bargaining agreement, and doubts as to the coverage of the arbitration clause shall be resolved in favor of arbitration. Disputes concerning compliance with grievance procedures shall be reserved for determination by the arbitrator.

(5) If a party to a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter refuses to comply with the award of an arbitrator determining a grievance arising under such collective bargaining agreement, the other party to the collective bargaining agreement, or any affected employee, may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court for any county in which the labor dispute exists, and such court has jurisdiction to issue an order enforcing the arbitration award. The commission, on its own motion, may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court where a strike or lockout is in existence. The court shall not substitute its judgment for that of the arbitrator and shall enforce any arbitration award which is based on the collective bargaining agreement, except that an arbitration award shall not be enforced and a new arbitration proceeding may be ordered:

(a) If the arbitration award was procured by corruption, fraud, or undue means;

(b) If there was evident partiality or corruption in the arbitrator or arbitrators;

(c) If the arbitrator or arbitrators were guilty of misconduct, in refusing to postpone a hearing upon sufficient cause shown, or in refusing to hear evidence pertinent and material to the controversy, or of any other misbehavior by which the rights of any party have been prejudiced; or

(d) If the arbitrator or arbitrators have exceeded their powers, or so imperfectly executed them that a final and definite award on the subject matter was not made, in which event the court also has discretion to remand the matter to the arbitrator or arbitrators who issued the defective award.

[ 2002 c 356 s 11.]